District of Columbia statutes.
28-2108

Proceedings for benefit of all creditors.

A proceeding instituted under this chapter by one or more creditors is deemed to be for the equal benefit of all creditors, but the court may make such allowance to the creditor or creditors instituting the same, out of the fund to be distributed, or expenses, including counsel fees, as may be just and equitable.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28-2108.
1973 Ed., § 28-2108.